Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4855.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 43510. (1) Subject to subsection (2), except as provided in section 43513, and except for an individual hunting on a game bird hunting preserve licensed under part 417, an individual shall not carry or transport a firearm, slingshot, bow and arrow, crossbow, or a trap while in any area frequented by wild animals unless that individual has in his or her the individual's possession a license as required under this part. (2) This act or a rule promulgated or order issued by the department or the commission under this act shall does not be construed to prohibit an individual from transporting a pistol or carrying a loaded pistol, whether concealed or not, if either any of the following applies:apply: (a) The individual has in his or her the individual's possession a license to carry a concealed pistol under 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.421 to 28.435. (b) The individual is authorized under the circumstances to carry a concealed pistol without obtaining a license to carry a concealed pistol under 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.421 to 28.435, as provided for under any of the following: (i) Section 12a of 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.432a. (ii) Section 227, 227a, 231, or 231a of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.227, 750.227a, 750.231, and 750.231a. (c) The individual is hunting game with a bow and arrow. (3) Subsection (2) does not authorize an individual to take or attempt to take a wild animal except as provided by law. An individual who is carrying a pistol under subsection (2) shall not use that pistol to take game or dispatch wounded game during archery season unless the game endangers the individual's life or safety.